Utah statutes.
72-10-112.   Failure to register -- Penalty.
Failure to register any aircraft required to be registered with the state in
the county in which the aircraft is located subjects the owners of the
aircraft to the same penalties provided for motor vehicles under Sections
41-1a-1101, 41-1a-1301, and 41-1a-1307.
